Louisiana, session 2026, SB416.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:149(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:416(A)(4)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§149. Reemployment of retirees
* * *
B. Any person who retires under any early retirement incentive plan of the
state of Louisiana for state employees shall not be reemployed by any department of
state government for two years after the effective date of their retirement. The
provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to seasonal fire fighting personnel
employed by the office of forestry in the Department of Agriculture and Forestry,
and election-related personnel in the Department of State, or rehired employees
who fill critical shortage positions within the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, corrections services. Reemployment of election personnel shall not
exceed six weeks prior to an election and two weeks following an election.
* * *
§416. Employment of retirees
A. Regardless of age, if a retiree of the system is engaged or hereafter
engages in employment which otherwise would render him eligible for membership
in the system, he shall choose one of the following irrevocable options:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 416 ENROLLED
* * *
(4) Option 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section or any
other law to the contrary, any retiree of the system, who has been retired for at
least one year from the effective date of his retirement, may be reemployed to
fill certain critical shortage positions within the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, corrections services, subject to all of the following:
(a) For the purposes of this Subsection, a "critical shortage position" is
defined as a full-time position for which the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, corrections services, has advertised in accordance with Louisiana
civil service rules and has received an insufficient number of suitable applicants.
The secretary shall determine candidate suitability based on operational needs
and institutional requirements. Critical shortage positions shall include but are
not limited to the following full-time positions, as certified by the secretary of
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections based on fluctuating critical
needs:
(i) Major.
(ii) Captain.
(iii) Lieutenant.
(iv) Specialized sergeant-master.
(v) Cadet, sergeant, or master sergeant.
(vi) Registered nurse.
(vii) Licensed practical nurse.
(viii) Social worker.
(b) Prior to the posting of a critical shortage position pursuant to this
Paragraph, the secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall certify in writing the need to fill the vacancy.
(c) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall annually review and certify in writing the continued necessity of filling the
critical shortage position or the continued reemployment of the retiree in the
position.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 416 ENROLLED
(d) A retiree reemployed in a critical shortage position pursuant to this
Subsection shall be entitled to receive his full retirement benefits during the
period of reemployment.
(e) During the period of reemployment in a critical shortage position,
both the reemployed retiree and the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, corrections services, shall make contributions to the retirement
system as required by the system. However, the reemployed retiree shall not
earn additional service credit or accrue any additional retirement benefits.
Upon termination of reemployment, the retiree shall be refunded the employee
contributions made during the period of reemployment, without interest.
Employer contributions made during this period shall be retained by the
retirement system.
(f) No member of this system who retires based on a disability shall
return to service pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph. Disability
retirees shall be governed by the provisions of this Chapter applicable to
disability retirees.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.